Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska20-313
Handicap, defined.

Handicap shall mean, with respect to a person:

(1) A physical or mental impairment which substantially limits one or more of such person's major life activities;

(2) A record of having such an impairment; or

(3) Being regarded as having such an impairment.

Handicap shall not include current, illegal use of or addiction to a controlled substance as defined in section 28-401.

Laws 1991, LB 825, § 14.